Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.900

Construction—Religious organization.

"Religious organization" as defined in this chapter must be interpreted liberally to include faith-based social service organizations involved in social services directed at the larger community.

[ 2012 c 3 s 3 (Referendum Measure No. 74, approved November 6, 2012).]

NOTES:

Notice—2012 c 3: See note following RCW 26.04.010.